Utah statutes.
32B-13-202.   Application requirements for beer wholesaling license.

To obtain a beer wholesaling license, a person shall submit to the department:

(1)  a written application in a form prescribed by the department;

(2)  a nonrefundable $300 application fee;

(3)  an initial license fee of $2,300 that is refundable if a beer wholesaling license is not issued;

(4)  written consent of the local authority;

(5)  a copy of the person's current business license;

(6)  a bond as specified in Section 32B-13-206;

(7)  a statement of the brands of beer the person is authorized to sell and distribute;

(8)  a statement of the one or more sales territories in which the person is authorized to sell and distribute beer under an agreement required by Section 32B-11-201 or 32B-11-503;

(9)  evidence that the person is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(10)  a signed consent form stating that the beer wholesaling licensee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the licensed premises;

(11)  if the person is an entity, proper verification evidencing that a person who signs the application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(12)  any other information that the commission or department may require.

